District of Columbia statutes.
47-859.05

Tax abatements for new residential developments — Rules.

The Mayor shall promulgate rules to implement §§ 47-859.01 through 47-859.04 within 180 days after [July 7, 2009].

July 7, 2009, D.C. Law 18-10, § 2(b), 56 DCR 3598
Delegation of Authority Pursuant to D.C. Law 18-10, the NOMA Residential Development Tax Abatement Act of 2009, see Mayor’s Order 2010-61, April 23, 2010 ( 57 DCR 3509).